Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 100 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Mixed-use development" means a development consisting of residential
and nonresidential uses in which the nonresidential uses are less than fifty
percent (50%) of the total square footage of the development, and are
limited to the first floor of buildings that are two (2) or more stories; and
(b) "Multi-unit dwelling" means a structure with more than two (2) separate
dwelling units each with its own entrance.
(2) Multi-unit dwellings and mixed-use developments shall be considered a permitted
use in all commercial zones.
(3) A planning unit shall not adopt or enforce any regulation or ordinance that:
(a) Prohibits multi-unit dwellings or mixed-use developments in commercial
zones;
(b) Imposes requirements on multi-unit dwellings or mixed-use developments
that are more restrictive than those placed on other uses within a
commercial zone; or
(c) Requires multi-unit dwellings or mixed-use developments to have on the
property or share via a parking agreement more than one (1) off-street
parking space for each unit in addition to accessible parking spaces as
required by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act, 42 U.S.C. sec.
12101 et seq.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/5/2026 3:10 PM Jacketed